West Virginia, session 2026, SB513.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 2. Legal Holidays; special memorial days; construction of statutes; interpretation of statutes; definitions. §2-2-10a. Statutory interpretation. (a) In interpreting a state statute, regulation, or other sub-regulatory document, a state court or an officer hearing an administrative action may not defer to a state agency's interpretation of it, and must instead interpret its meaning and effect de novo.(b) In actions brought by or against state agencies, after applying all customary tools of interpretation, the court or hearing officer must exercise any remaining doubt in favor of a reasonable interpretation which limits agency power and maximizes individual liberty.